Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-277
Demand.

(MBCA 7.42) (a) No shareholder may commence
a derivative proceeding until:

(1) A written demand has
been made upon the corporation to take suitable action; and

(2) Ninety days have expired
from the date delivery of the demand was made unless the shareholder has earlier
been notified that the demand has been rejected by the corporation or unless
irreparable injury to the corporation would result by waiting for the expiration
of the ninety-day period.

(b)
Venue for a proceeding under this section lies in the district court of the
county where the corporation's principal office, or, if none in this state,
its registered office, is located.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 77.